Massachusetts, session 194th, S933.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Chapter 75 of the General Laws is hereby amended by striking out section 4 and inserting 
in place thereof the following section:- 
Section 4. The trustees shall determine the time and place of their meeting. Nine 
members shall constitute a quorum. Meetings of the board of trustees shall be subject to the 
provisions of sections 11A and 11A½ of chapter 30A; provided, however, that in addition to the 
purposes set forth in said section 11A½, the trustees may hold an executive session to consider 
the award of honorary degrees. The trustees may further hold an executive session to consider 
the award of tenure to a member of the faculty, if the member who is being considered for tenure 
in such executive session has been notified in writing, by the trustees, at least 48 hours prior to 
the proposed executive session; provided, however, that notification may be waived upon 

of 2 11 agreement of the parties; and provided, further, that the trustees shall hold an open meeting if 
such member requests that the meeting be open. If an executive session is held, such member 
shall have the following rights: (a) to be present at such executive session during discussion or 
considerations which involve such member; (b) to have counsel or a representative of his own 
choosing present and attending for the purpose of advising such member and not for the purpose 
of active participation in said executive session; and (c) to speak on his own behalf.